Ohio, session 136, HB969.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That sections 3709.03 and 3709.07 of the Revised Code be amended to read as follows: Sec. 3709.03. (A) There is hereby created in each general health district a district advisory council. A council shall consist of the president of the board of county commissioners, the chief executive of each municipal corporation not constituting a city health district, and the chairperson of the board of township trustees of each township. The board of county commissioners, the legislative body of a municipal corporation, and the board of township trustees of a township may select an alternate from among themselves to serve if the president, the chief executive, or the chairperson is unable to attend any meeting of the district advisory council. When attending a meeting on behalf of a council member, the alternate may vote on any matter on which the member is authorized to vote. The council shall organize by selecting a chair and secretary from among its members. The council shall adopt bylaws governing its meetings, the transaction of business, and voting procedures. The council shall meet annually in March at a place determined by the chair and the health commissioner for the purpose of electing the chair and the secretary, making necessary appointments to the board of health, receiving and considering the annual or special reports from the board of health, and making recommendations to the board of health or to the department of health in regard to matters for the betterment of health and sanitation within the district or for needed legislation. The secretary of the council shall notify the district health commissioner and the director of health of the proceedings of such meeting. Special meetings of the council shall be held on the order of any of the following: (1) The director of health; (2) The board of health; (3) The lesser of five or a majority of district advisory council members. The district health commissioner shall attend all meetings of the council. (B) The district advisory council shall appoint five members of the board of health, unless the board of health has established a health district licensing council under section 3709.41 of the Revised Code, in which case, the district advisory council shall appoint four members of the board of health, and the health district licensing council shall appoint one member of the board of health. At least one member of the board of health shall be either a physician, physician assistant, or certified nurse practitioner as defined in section 4723.01 of the Revised Code. Appointments shall be made with due regard to equal representation of all parts of the district. (C) If at an annual or special meeting at which a member of the board of health is to be appointed fewer than a majority of the members of the district council are present, the council, by the majority vote of council members present, may organize an executive committee to make the appointment. An executive committee shall consist of five council members, including the president of the board of county commissioners, the council chair, the council secretary, and two additional council members selected by majority affirmative vote of the council members present at the meeting. The additional members selected shall include one representative of municipal corporations in the district that are not city health districts and one representative of townships in the district. If an individual is eligible for more than one position on the executive committee due to holding a particular office, the individual shall fill one position on the committee and the other position shall be filled by a member selected by a majority affirmative vote of the council members present at the meeting. A council member's alternate for annual meetings may serve as the member's alternate at meetings of the executive committee. Not later than thirty days after an executive committee is organized, the committee shall meet and the council chair shall present to the committee the matter of appointing a member of the board of health. The committee shall appoint the board member by majority affirmative vote. In the case of a combined health district, the executive committee shall appoint only members of the board of health that are to be appointed by the district advisory council, unless the contract for administration of health affairs in the combined district provides otherwise. If a majority affirmative vote is not reached within thirty days after the executive committee is organized, the director of health shall appoint the member of the board of health under the authority conferred by section 3709.03 of the Revised Code. If the council fails to meet or appoint a member of the board of health as required by this section or section 3709.02 of the Revised Code, the director of health may appoint the member. Sec. 3709.07. Except as provided in section 3709.071 of the Revised Code, when it is proposed that one or more city health districts unite with a general health district in the formation of a single district, the district advisory council of the general health district shall meet and vote on the question of union. It shall require a majority affirmative vote of the members of the district advisory council to carry the question. The legislative authority of each city constituting a city health district shall likewise vote on the question. A majority voting affirmatively shall be required for approval. When the majority of the district advisory council and the legislative authority have voted affirmatively, the chair of the council and the chief executive of each city shall enter into a contract for the administration of health affairs in the combined district. Such contract shall state the proportion of the expenses of the board of health or health department of the combined district t o be paid by the city or cities and by the original general health district. The contract may provide that the administration of the combined district shall be taken over by either the board of health or health department of one of the cities, by the board of health of the general health district, or by a combined board of health. Such contract shall prescribe the date on which such change of administration shall be made. A copy of such contract shall be filed with the director of health. The combined district shall constitute a general health district, and the board of health or health department of the city, the board of health of the original general health district, or the combined board of health, as may be agreed in the contract, shall have, within the combined district, all the powers granted to, and perform all the duties required of, the board of health of a general health district. The district advisory council of the combined general health district shall consist of the members of the district advisory council of the original general health district and the chief executive of each city constituting a city health district, each member having one vote. If the contract provides that the administration of the combined district shall be taken over by a combined board of health, rather than the board of health of the original health district, the contract shall set forth the number of members of such board, their terms of office, and the manner of appointment or election of officers. One of the members of such combined board of health shall be either a physician, physician assistant, or certified nurse practitioner as defined in section 4723.01 of the Revised Code, and one member shall be an individual appointed by the health district licensing council, if such council is established under section 3709.41 of the Revised Code. The contract may also provide for the representation of areas by one or more members and shall, in such event, specify the territory to be included in each such area. The appointment of any member of the combined board who is designated by the provisions of the contract to represent a city shall be made by the chief executive and approved by the legislative authority of such city. If a member is designated by the contract to represent more than one city, the member shall be appointed by majority vote of the chief executives of all cities included in any such area. Except for the member appointed by the health district licensing council, if such council is established, the appointment of all members of the combined board who are designated to represent the balance of the district shall be made by the district advisory council. The service status of any person employed by a city or general health district shall not be affected by the creation of a combined district. Section 2. That existing sections 3709.03 and 3709.07 of the Revised Code are hereby repealed.